Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.155

Use of buildings for youth programs—Limited immunity.

In order to facilitate school districts permitting the use of school buildings for use by private nonprofit groups operating youth programs, school districts shall have a limited immunity in accordance with RCW 4.24.660. Nothing in RCW 4.24.660, including a school district's failure to require a private nonprofit group to have liability insurance, broadens the scope of a school district's liability.

[ 1999 c 316 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1999 c 316: "The legislature intends to expand the opportunities of children to take advantage of services of private nonprofit groups by encouraging the groups' use of public school district facilities to provide programs to serve youth in the facilities. The legislature intends the very limited grant of immunity provided in this act to encourage such use, but only under the circumstances set forth in this act." [ 1999 c 316 s 1.]

Effective date—1999 c 316: "This act takes effect January 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 316 s 4.]